Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 28

Assessment Coordination Division

25-28-101. Creation — Director — Organization — Personnel.

The director shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

All personnel of the Assessment Coordination Division shall be employed by the Department of Finance and Administration and shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary.

However, nothing in this section shall be so construed as to reduce any right which an employee of the Assessment Coordination Division shall have under any civil service or merit system.

The director may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to the various divisions of the Assessment Coordination Division as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the Assessment Coordination Division.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 436, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 3574.

25-28-102. [Repealed.]

History.

Acts 1997, No. 436, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 2931; 2019, No. 910, § 3576.

25-28-104. Administrative Procedure Act.

The Assessment Coordination Division shall be subject to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 436, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 3577.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Assessment Coordination Division” for “Assessment Coordination Department” and inserted “Arkansas” preceding “Administrative Procedure Act”.

25-28-105. Compliance with other laws.

Disbursement of funds authorized by this chapter shall be limited to the appropriation for the agency being transferred and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations. The restrictions of the Arkansas Procurement Law, §19-11-201, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, §19-4-101, the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq., the Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act, §21-5-101, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this state, where applicable, and rules promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in disbursement of those funds.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 436, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 2932.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

25-28-106. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations transferred or referred to in this subchapter shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for which this subchapter was adopted, as evidenced by the agency requests, executive recommendations and legislative recommendations contained in the budget manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 436, § 6.

25-28-107. Requirements of Director of the Assessment Coordination Division.

The Director of the Assessment Coordination Division shall meet the qualifications required for certification or licensure as a Level 4 Appraiser in Arkansas, provided that the formal course work was or is satisfactorily completed in another state. At the time of appointing the director, the Governor shall include in the appointment document a statement that the appointee meets the qualifications prescribed by law.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1377, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 3578.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Assessment Coordination Division” for “Assessment Coordination Department” in the section heading and in text of the section; and deleted “From and after July 1, 2000” from the beginning of the section.

25-28-108. Specifications for computer-assisted mass appraisal software.

By July 1, 2005, the Assessment Coordination Division shall adopt and implement by rules final specifications for computer-assisted mass appraisal software.

The rules may provide a procedure by which the division may directly compensate computer-assisted mass appraisal software providers who are in compliance with requirements set forth in the final specifications for computer-assisted mass appraisal software.

The division shall require computer-assisted mass appraisal software providers to comply with requirements set forth in the final specifications for computer-assisted mass appraisal software.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in §§25-28-101 —25-28-107 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Assessment Coordination Division” for “Assessment Coordination Department” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1) and (2).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning additional authority, was repealed by Acts 2011, No. 633, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 26, § 3; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 27, § 3.

Cross References. Telecommunications devices, §20-79-401 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 15: Apr. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the deaf and hearing impaired citizens of this state have inadequate access to telecommunications services; that this act will enhance the delivery of telecommunications services to the deaf and hearing impaired citizens of this state, and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 102, § 2: Sept. 1, 2007. Effective date clause provided: “This act is effective September 1, 2007.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Cited: GTE Ark., Inc. v. Arkansas Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 60 Ark. App. 288, 961 S.W.2d 792 (1998).

The Governor shall appoint one (1) member after consulting representatives of the deaf and hearing-impaired community and one (1) member after consulting representatives of Arkansas local exchange carriers.

Members appointed by the Governor under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be subject to confirmation of the Senate.

The initial appointments shall be for such terms as will result in two (2) serving a one-year term, two (2) serving a two-year term, and three (3) serving a three-year term. All successors shall serve three-year terms.

The Governor shall designate one (1) of the board members to preside over the initial meeting of the board, at which meeting the board shall elect a president, a secretary, and such other officers as it deems appropriate.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for reasonable expenses, except that no corporate money shall be used for out-of-state travel expenses.

All vacancies on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1100 added the language at §25-29-101(c)(2) “Members appointed by the Governor under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be subject to confirmation of the Senate.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote and redesignated former (c) as (c)(1); and added (c)(2).

Within thirty (30) days after each regular board meeting, the secretary of the board shall give written notice to the Governor of any member who has been absent from three (3) successive regular meetings without attending any intermediary called special meetings.

The secretary's notice to the Governor shall include a copy of all meeting notices and attendance records for the past year.

Failure by the secretary to submit the notices and documentation required by this chapter shall be considered cause for removal by the Governor in accordance with the procedures set forth at § 25-17-210;

Within sixty (60) days after receiving the notice and supporting documentation from the secretary, the Governor shall notify, in writing, the board member of his or her intent to remove the member for cause. This notice shall suffice for the notice required in § 25-17-210(a);

Within twenty (20) days after the date of the Governor's notice, the board member may request an excused absence as provided by this chapter or may file with the Governor's office notice that the member disputes the attendance records and the reasons therefor;

The Governor shall grant an excuse for illness of the member when verified by a written sworn statement by the attending physician or other proper excuse as determined by the Governor; and

If no rebuttal is received or other adequate documentation submitted within twenty (20) days after the date of the Governor's notice, the board member may be removed in accordance with the provisions set forth in § 25-17-210.

As used in this section, “commercial mobile radio service” means the same as defined in § 12-10-303.

The board may adjust the assessment no more than once in a calendar year quarter, but at no time shall the assessment exceed the amount set in subsection (a) of this section.

The assessment under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall not be levied on more than one hundred (100) lines at any single customer location.

The assessments levied under subsection (a) of this section may be collected by the providers of local exchange service or commercial mobile radio service from their customers and transmitted monthly to the board, and the board shall deposit the assessments into a financial institution authorized to accept public funds.

The assessments levied under subsection (a) of this section by the corporation shall not be considered a tax and shall not be affected by any laws of this state governing taxation, nor shall the assessments be subject to any state or local tax or franchise fee.

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, No. 102, § 2, provided: “This act is effective September 1, 2007.”

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1417, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 3579.

25-28-109. [Repealed.]

25-29-101. Creation — Board of directors.

There is hereby created the Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation.

The corporation shall be governed by a seven-member board of directors appointed by the Governor as follows:

Three (3) shall be representatives of the deaf and hearing-impaired community; and

Four (4) shall be representatives of Arkansas local exchange carriers.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 1; 1999, No. 1583, § 1; Acts 2015, No. 1100, § 63.

25-29-102. Board of directors — Attendance at meetings required.

In order to ensure broad representation and a quorum, all members of the Board of Directors of the Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation have a responsibility to attend all regular or special meetings of the board.

A board member shall be subject to removal from the board in the event the member shall fail to present to the Governor a satisfactory excuse for his or her absence. Unexcused absences from three (3) successive regular meetings without attending any intermediary called special meetings shall constitute sufficient cause for removal.

Removal of board members shall be in accordance with the following:

Any board member referred to the Governor because of excessive absences under the provisions of this chapter shall not be entitled to any expense reimbursement for travel to or attendance at any subsequent meeting until the board receives notification from the Governor that the member has been excused for the absences.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 2.

25-29-103. Assessment on local exchange service providers.

In order to fund the services provided by the Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation, the Board of Directors of the Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation shall levy assessments on all providers of:

Local l exchange service not to exceed ten cents (10¢) per subject access line per month in order to fund the services provided by the corporation; and

(A)Commercial mobile radio service not to exceed ten cents (10¢) per customer account or number.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 3; 2007, No. 102, § 1.

25-29-104. Powers and duties.

The Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation shall:

Provide telecommunications relay services, including, but not limited to, services that enable two-way communication between an individual who uses a TDD or other nonvoice terminal device and an individual who does not use such a device, for persons who are deaf, hearing impaired, deaf and blind, or severely speech impaired;

Take other actions necessary and proper to provide telecommunications services to persons who are deaf, hearing impaired, deaf and blind, or severely speech impaired;

Have perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate, adopt bylaws for the regulation of the affairs and the conduct of its business, and prescribe rules and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;

Adopt an official seal and alter it at pleasure;

Sue and be sued in its own name and plead and be impleaded;

Make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the authority under this chapter, including contracts with persons, firms, corporations, and others;

Purchase insurance; and

Do any and all other acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of this chapter and to exercise the powers granted to it by this chapter.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (3).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 2933.

25-29-105. Staff — Real property — Debt.

The Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation shall not employ any person as a salaried employee but shall rely upon volunteers and professional services obtained by contract.

No corporate asset may be used to purchase or lease any real property, nor is the corporation authorized to incur any indebtedness.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 5.

25-29-106. Corporate offices.

The Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation may maintain an office at such location as it deems suitable.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 6.

25-29-107. Annual audit.

The Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation shall be audited annually in accordance with generally accepted accounting procedures and file a copy of the audit with the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee and the Arkansas Public Service Commission.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 7.

25-29-108. Articles of incorporation.

Within thirty (30) days after the first meeting of the Board of Directors of the Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation, it shall cause articles of incorporation be filed with the Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 8.

25-29-109. Purchase of telecommunications services.

The purchase of telecommunications services by the Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation shall be by competitive bid using procedures substantially similar to the Arkansas Procurement Law, §19-11-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 9.

25-29-110. Annual report.

The Board of Directors of the Arkansas Deaf and Hearing Impaired Telecommunications Services Corporation shall transmit to the Legislative Council, the Secretary of the Department of Commerce, and the Arkansas Public Service Commission an annual report of its activities. The annual report shall be filed by March 31 of each year.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 622.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Commerce” for “Governor”.

25-29-111. Section 12 companies.

The provisions of this section apply only to telecommunications corporations with fewer than ten thousand (10,000) access lines which have elected to become Section 12 companies pursuant to § 23-17-412.

All telecommunications companies currently making contributions which affect the Arkansas Intrastate Carrier Common Line Pool (AICCLP) or the Arkansas IntraLATA Toll Pool, or both, due to prior review shall not be required to continue making the contributions effective upon the companies' election as Section 12 companies, pursuant to § 23-17-412.

Provided, if the companies discontinue making contributions to the Arkansas Intrastate Carrier Common Line Pool (AICCLP) or the Arkansas IntraLATA Toll Pool, or both, one percent (1%) of contributions that would have been made to the Arkansas Intrastate Carrier Common Line Pool (AICCLP) or the Arkansas IntraLATA Toll Pool, or both, for ten (10) months will be paid for start-up costs to the corporation provided for in this chapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 11.

25-29-112. Effect of chapter on Acts 1995, No. 501.

All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this chapter are hereby repealed. However, to the extent any provisions of this chapter conflict with any provisions of Acts 1995, No. 501, the provisions of Acts 1995, No. 501, shall prevail.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1080, § 14.

Publisher's Notes. As to the codification of Acts 1995, No. 501, please consult Tables Volume B.

25-28-103. Other authority.